test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paksja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - пакся: # Ordinary nouns 'field' - full paradigm including MWN
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: пакся
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+Indef: паксянь
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+Indef: паксяда
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+Indef: паксянди
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+Indef: паксяфтома
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+Indef: паксяшка
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+Indef: паксяса
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+Indef: паксяста
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+Indef: паксяс
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+Indef: паксява
     пакся+N+SP+Tra+Indef: паксякс
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: паксязе
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: паксяне
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: паксязень
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: паксянень
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [паксязти, паксязенди]
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: паксяненди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: паксядон
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: паксяфтомон
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: паксяшкан
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: паксясон
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: паксястон
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: паксязон
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: паксяван
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: паксяце
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: паксятне
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: паксяцень
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: паксятнень
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: [паксяцти, паксяценди]
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: паксятненди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: паксядот
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: паксяфтомот
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: паксяшкат
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: паксясот
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: паксястот
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: паксязот
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: паксяват
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: паксяц
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: паксянза
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: паксянц
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: паксянзон
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: паксянцты
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: паксянзонды
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: паксядонза
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: паксяфтомонза
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: паксяшканза
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: паксясонза
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: паксястонза
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: паксязонза
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: паксяванза
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: паксяньке
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: паксяньконь
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: паксяньконди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: паксядонк
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: паксяфтомонк
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: паксяшканк
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: паксясонк
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: паксястонк
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: паксязонк
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: паксяванк
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: паксянте
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: паксянтень
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: паксянтенди
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: паксядонт
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: паксяфтомонт
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: паксяшкант
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: паксясонт
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: паксястонт
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: паксязонт
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: паксявант
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: паксясна
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: паксяснон
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: паксяснонды
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: паксядост
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: паксяфтомост
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: паксяшкаст
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: паксясост
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: паксястост
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: паксязост
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: паксяваст
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: паксят
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Def: паксясь
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+Def: паксять
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+Def: паксяти
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Def: паксятне
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+Def: паксятнень
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+Def: паксятненди    
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: паксявок
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяньге
     #пакся+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: паксяньге 
     #синь+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: синьге 
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: паксядовок
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяндивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяфтомовок
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяшкавок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: паксясовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: паксястовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяска
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: паксявавок
     пакся+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: паксякска
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксязевок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяневок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксязеньге
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяненьге
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксязтивок
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксянендивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксядонга
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонга
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяшканга
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксясонга
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксястонга
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксязонга
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяванга
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяцевок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксятневок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяценьге
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксятненьге
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксядотка
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяфтомотка
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяшкатка
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксясотка
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксястотка
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксязотка
# or should it be паксязтка
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяватка
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяцка
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянзовок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянцка
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянзонга
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянцтывок
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянзондывок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксядонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяшканзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксясонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксястонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксязонзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяванзовок
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксянькевок
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксяньконьге
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксянькондивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксядонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксяшканковок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксясонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксястонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксязонковок
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксяванковок
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксянтевок
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксянтеньге
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксянтендивок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксядонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксяшкантовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксясонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксястонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксязонтовок
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксявантовок
     пакся+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксясновок
     пакся+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяснонга
     пакся+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяснондывок
     пакся+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксядостка
     пакся+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяфтомостка
     пакся+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяшкастка
     пакся+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксясостка
     пакся+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксястостка
     пакся+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксязостка
     пакся+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксявастка
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: паксятка
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: паксяське
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: паксятьке
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: паксятивок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: паксятневок
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: паксятненьге
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: паксятнендивок
